Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1111
Nominations for merged city offices; special election.

Candidates for merged city offices shall be nominated at a special election to be held no less than thirty days after the election at which the merger is approved by the voters and no less than sixty days prior to the next statewide general election. The election shall be held in accordance with the Election Act.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 11.

Election Act, see section 32-101.